Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB777.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 230.805 TO 230.826 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "suspicious wagering activity" means unusual wagering
activity that cannot be otherwise explained and is indicative of match fixing, the
manipulation of an event, misuse of inside information, or other prohibited
activity.
(2) Sports wagering licensees and service providers shall not limit the size or
frequency of deposits or wagers of any person engaging in sports wagering based
on:
(a) If a person obtains a financial benefit as a result of their wagering activity;
or
(b) Due to that person's wagering activity, unless the wagering activity:
1. Constitutes suspicious wagering activity; or
2. Indicates that a person is a problem or compulsive gambler.
(3) If a person is limited or banned, a sports wagering licensee or service provider
shall send that person an electronic notification within twenty-four (24) hours of
issuing the limit or ban to include:
(a) The manner in which a person is being restricted;
(b) An explanation of why the person is being limited or banned, including
specifying if the restriction is for suspicious wagering activity or problem
gambling;
(c) The duration of the limit or ban;
(d) Directions on how to appeal a limit or ban under subsection (4) of this
section; and
(e) A link to the Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services problem
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2150
gambling program resources webpage if the limit or ban is due to problem
gambling.
(4) Sports wagering licensees and service providers shall:
(a) Establish an appeal process for a person that has been limited or banned
under this section; and
(b) Notify that person of the determination of an appeal within one (1) week of
the appeal being submitted.
Section 2. KRS 230.805 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The corporation shall institute a system of sports wagering in conformance with
federal law, this chapter, and by administrative regulations promulgated under the
authority of KRS 230.215.
(2) Sports wagering shall not be offered in this state except as authorized by this
section and KRS 230.811. A track that holds a license to operate sports wagering
may contract with sports wagering service providers to conduct or manage sports
wagering operations as authorized by this chapter. Sports wagering may be
provided at a licensed facility for sports wagering or online through a website or
mobile application. The licensed facility for sports wagering or a sports wagering
service provider may provide sports wagering through a website or mobile interface
as approved by the corporation. The corporation may provide temporary licenses to
licensed facilities for sports wagering or sports wagering service providers, if the
corporation deems that the information submitted by them is sufficient to determine
the applicant's suitability. The corporation may promulgate administrative
regulations to establish the suitability for temporary and ordinary license
applications for licensed facilities for sports wagering, sports wagering service
providers, and any related parties.
(3) Sports wagering licensees and service providers that accept wagers online via
websites and mobile applications shall impose the following requirements:
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2150
(a) Prior to placing a wager online via websites or mobile applications operated
by either a sports wagering licensee or a service provider, a patron shall
register the patron's sports wagering account with the operating sports
wagering licensee or service provider either in person at a licensed facility for
sports wagering or remotely through the service provider's website or mobile
application;
(b) 1. The registration process shall include attestation that the patron meets
the requirements to place a wager with a sports wagering licensee or
service provider in this state.
2. Prior to verification of a patron's identity, a sports wagering licensee or
service provider shall not allow the patron to engage in sports wagering,
make a deposit, or process a withdrawal via the patron's sports wagering
account.
3. A sports wagering licensee or service provider shall implement
commercially and technologically reasonable procedures to prevent
access to sports wagering by any person under the age of twenty-one
(21)[eighteen (18)]:
a. At a licensed facility; and
b. Online via website or mobile application.
4. A sports wagering licensee or service provider may use information
obtained from third parties to verify that a person is authorized to open
an account, place wagers, and make deposits and withdrawals;
(c) A sports wagering licensee or service provider shall adopt an account
registration policy to ensure that all patrons are authorized to place a wager
with a sports wagering licensee or service provider within the Commonwealth
of Kentucky. This policy shall include, without limitation, a mechanism by
which to:
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2150
1. Verify the name and age of the patron;
2. Verify that the patron is not prohibited from placing a wager; and
3. Obtain the following information:
a. A physical address other than a post office box;
b. A phone number;
c. A unique user name; and
d. An email[e-mail] account;
(d) A sports wagering licensee or service provider shall use all commercially and
technologically reasonable means to ensure that each patron is limited to one
(1) account with that service provider in the Commonwealth, but nothing in
this paragraph restricts a patron from holding other sports wagering accounts
in other jurisdictions;
(e) A sports wagering licensee or service provider, in addition to complying with
state and federal law pertaining to the protection of the private, personal
information of patrons, shall use all other commercially and technologically
reasonable means to protect this information consistent with industry
standards;
(f) A sports wagering licensee or service provider shall use all commercially and
technologically reasonable means to verify the identity of the patron making a
deposit or withdrawal;
(g) A sports wagering licensee or service provider shall utilize geolocation or
geofencing technology to ensure that wagers are only accepted from patrons
who are physically located in the Commonwealth. A sports wagering licensee
or service provider shall maintain in this state its servers used to transmit
information for purposes of accepting or paying out wagers on a sporting
event placed by patrons in this state;
(h) A patron may fund the patron's account using any acceptable form of payment
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2150
or advance deposit method, which shall include the use of cash, cash
equivalents, credit cards, debit cards, automated clearing house, other
electronic methods, and any other form of payment authorized by the
corporation; and
(i) The corporation may enter into agreements with other jurisdictions or entities
to facilitate, administer, and regulate multijurisdictional sports betting by
sports betting operators to the extent that entering into the agreement is
consistent with state and federal laws and the sports betting agreement is
conducted only in the United States.
(4) A track may contract with no more than three (3) service providers at a time to
conduct and manage services and technology which support the operation of sports
betting both on the track and online via websites and mobile applications. The
website or mobile application used to offer sports betting shall be offered only
under the same brand as the track or that of the service provider contracted with the
track, or both.
(5) A track or service provider through an agreement with a licensed track shall not
offer sports wagering until the corporation has issued a sports wagering license to
the track, except for temporary licenses authorized under KRS 230.814.
(6) (a) A track licensed under KRS 230.811 may offer sports wagering at a facility
that meets the definition of "track" in KRS 230.210.
(b) A simulcast facility may offer sports wagering through an agreement with a
track by using any of that track's already established service providers.
Section 3. KRS 2.015 is amended to read as follows:
Persons of the age of eighteen (18) years are of the age of majority for all purposes in this
Commonwealth except for the purchase of alcoholic beverages, sports wagering, and for
purposes of care and treatment of children with disabilities, for which twenty-one (21)
years is the age of majority, all other statutes to the contrary notwithstanding.
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2150
Section 4. This Act may be cited as the Kentucky Fair Play Act.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/26/2026 3:02 PM Jacketed